Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-822
Administrators; employment; salary; contract; term.

At any regular meeting, a school board or board of education may elect for employment such administrators as the board may deem necessary for the proper conduct of the affairs of the school district at such salaries as the board may deem reasonable. It may contract with such administrators for terms not to exceed three years. No person shall be declared elected unless he or she receives the vote of a majority of all the members of the board. The contract of employment shall be reduced to writing.

Laws 1971, LB 802, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1254.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 452.